South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-1-455 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-1-455.  Beginning with the 1991-92 school year, all public school students, commencing with grades kindergarten through and including high school, shall during the course of each school day's activities at a specific time which must be designated by the local school require the pupils in each school in the district on every school day to salute the United States flag and say the Pledge of Allegiance as follows: "I pledge allegiance to the flag of the United States of America and to the republic for which it stands, one nation under God, indivisible, with liberty and justice for all." Anyperson not wishing to say the "Pledge of Allegiance" or otherwise participate in saying the "Pledge of Allegiance" is exempt from participation and may not be penalized for failing to participate. A person who does not wish to participate may leave the classroom, may remain in his seat, or may express his nonparticipation in any form which does not materially infringe upon the rights of other persons or disrupt school activities. pupils who are children of accredited representatives of foreign governments to whom the United States government extends diplomatic immunity, shall not be required to render such salute and pledge but shall be required to show full respect to the flag while the pledge is being given merely by standing at attention, the boys removing hats, hoods, or head coverings. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----